Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-946
Attorney General; access to records.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Attorney General, upon reasonable request, shall have full access to all records held by a provider, or by any other person on the provider's behalf, that are relevant to the determination of (a) the existence of civil violations or criminal offenses under the False Medicaid Claims Act or related offenses, (b) the existence of patient or resident abuse, mistreatment, or neglect, or (c) the theft of patient or resident funds.

(2) In examining such records, the Attorney General shall safeguard the privacy rights of recipients, avoiding unnecessary disclosure of personal information concerning named recipients. The Attorney General may transmit such information as he or she deems appropriate to the department and to other agencies concerned with the regulation of health care facilities or health professionals.

(3) No person holding such records may refuse to provide the Attorney General access to such records for the purposes described in the act on the basis that release would violate (a) a recipient's right of privacy, (b) a recipient's privilege against disclosure or use, or (c) any professional or other privilege or right.

Laws 2004, LB 1084, § 13;

R.S.Supp.,2004, § 68-1085;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 46;

Laws 2024, LB664, § 3.